el: Διακοσμητικό φινίρισμα: Γκλίτερ; Φωσφοριζέ; Ιριδίζον; Ματ; Μεταλλιζέ; Ανακλαστικό; Σατινέ λάμψη; Άλλο
sv: Kantfinish: Glitter; Självlysande; Skimrande; Matt; Metallisk; Reflekterande; Satinglans; Annat
ko: 트림 마감: 글리터; 야광; 무지갯빛; 무광; 메탈릭; 빛 반사; 새틴 광택; 기타
vi: Hoàn thiện viền: Lấp lánh; Dạ quang; Ngũ sắc; Mờ; Ánh kim; Phản quang; Ánh lụa satin; Khác
pl: Wykończenie lamówki: Brokat; Świecące w ciemności; Opalizujące; Matowe; Metaliczne; Odblaskowe; Satynowy połysk; Inne
zh-CN: 装饰表面处理: 闪亮; 夜光; 幻彩; 哑光; 金属色; 反光; 缎面光泽; 其他
hu: Díszcsík felülete: Csillámos; Sötétben világító; Színjátszó; Matt; Fémes; Fényvisszaverő; Szaténfényű; Egyéb
pt-BR: Aviamento acabamento: Glitter; Brilha no escuro; Iridescente; Fosco; Metálico; Refletivo; Brilho acetinado; Outro
sk-SK: Povrchová úprava lemu: Trblietavé; Svietiace v tme; Dúhové; Matné; Kovové; Reflexné; Saténový lesk; Iné
de: Oberflächentextur der Bordüre: Glitzer; Im Dunkeln leuchtend; Irisierend; Matt; Metallic; Reflektierend; Seidenglanz; Sonstiges
it: Finitura del bordo decorativo: Glitter; Fosforescente; Iridescente; Opaco; Metallizzato; Riflettente; Riflesso satinato; Altro
da: Finish på trim: Glimmer; Selvlysende; Iriserende; Mat; Metallisk; Reflekterende; Satinskær; Andet
ru: Отделка поверхности декоративной отделки: Глиттер; Светящийся в темноте; Переливающийся; Матовый; Металлик; Светоотражающий; Сатиновый блеск; Другое
ro-RO: Finisajul pasmanteriei: Sclipici; Strălucește în întuneric; Irizat; Mat; Metalic; Reflectorizant; Luciu satinat; Altele
ja: トリム仕上げ: グリッター; 蓄光; 玉虫色; マット; メタリック; リフレクター; サテンの光沢; その他
es: Acabado del ribete: Purpurina; Que brilla en la oscuridad; Iridiscente; Mate; Metálico; Reflectante; Brillo satinado; Otro
lt-LT: Apdailos: Blizgus (su blizgučiais); Šviečiantis tamsoje; Vaivorykštinis (žėrintis); Matinis; Metalizuotas; Atspindintis; Satino blizgesys; Kita
tr: Süsleme yüzey kaplaması: Simli; Karanlıkta parlayan; Yanardöner; Mat; Metalik; Yansıtıcı; Saten parlaklığı; Diğer
bg-BG: Финиш на канта: Брокат; Светещ в тъмното; Преливащ; Матов; Метален; Отразителен; Сатенен блясък; Друго
th: การตกแต่งขอบ: กลิตเตอร์; เรืองแสงในที่มืด; เหลือบรุ้ง; ผิวด้าน; เมทัลลิก; สะท้อนแสง; เงาซาติน; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 飾邊表面處理: 亮粉; 夜光; 虹彩; 霧面; 金屬光澤; 反光; 緞面光澤; 其他
hr-HR: Završna obrada ukrasa: Šljokice; Svijetli u mraku; Preljevno (iridescentno); Mat; Metalik; Reflektirajuće; Satenski sjaj; Ostalo
nl: Afwerking sierlijst: Glitter; Glow-in-the-dark; Iriserend; Mat; Metallic; Reflecterend; Satijnglans; Anders
fi: Koristeen viimeistely: Glitter; Pimeässä hohtava; Irisoiva; Matta; Metallinen; Heijastava; Satiinikiilto; Muu
sl-SI: Končni izgled obrobe: Z bleščicami; Svetleče v temi; Mavrično; Mat; Kovinsko; Odsevno; Satenast sijaj; Drugo
en: Trim finish: Glitter; Glow-in-the-dark; Iridescent; Matte; Metallic; Reflective; Satin sheen; Other
nb: Trimfinish: Glitter; Selvlysende; Iriserende; Matt; Metallisk; Reflekterende; Satengglans; Annet
cs: Povrchová úprava lemu: Třpytivé; Svítící ve tmě; Měňavé; Matné; Metalické; Reflexní; Saténový lesk; Ostatní
fr: Finition des moulures: Pailleté; Phosphorescent; Irisé; Mat; Métallique; Réfléchissant; Reflet satiné; Autre
pt-PT: Acabamento de superfície do acabamento: Purpurinas; Brilha no escuro; Iridescente; Mate; Metálico; Refletor; Brilho acetinado; Outro